demo/src/test/resources/hyph_en_CA.dic
pri1va
pr2iv
1priv1i
p1r2ik
pri3or
pri4or1a4
pri1on
p1r2i1ol
pring3i
pri1ch
1price
p3ri1cor
1pric1c
1p2rici
prit1c
pri3mac
pri3mat
pri3mal
prim3er
prim3in
pry3
p1k
p1uan
puer3
pu1de
pudg2
pus1e
pu1ser
puss1i
pur2er2
purs3es
purn1i
pur1b
pur1c
pur1i1o
2pur4ity1
purt1i2
purl3in
pur3ges
pur3ger
1purp
puk1i
pu2n1d
pun3cheo
2punity1
punt1e
pun3ger
pun1gi
pun1z2
1pub
pu1ber
pu1ch
puff3er
puf2f3ie
puff3ine
1putan
put3ant
1put1ed
puteri3z4a
puter3i
puter1iz
pu1tr
pu1tu
p1utie
1putin
put1t2e
put4ted
put3t2i.
put1ti
p1uty
pula3bi
pu1la
pu2lab
pulat4e
1puls
1pulos
pu1l2o
3pulchr2a
pul1c2hr
p1ul2i.
pu1lis
pul1in
pull3er
pull1i
1pug
pu1mo
pum1ie
1puy
po1al
poh3
1poe2
1po2d.
po1dea
1podes
po1dr2
po1d2iu
po1dic
po1dil
podg4
p1ody
1posa
pos1al
posh1
pos1es
pos1s2
po1sie
posi2
po1s1iv
post3al
post3ag
po1sp
por3adi
porad4
por3ato
por3at1in
por3al
por4a2l.
por1ea
por3ing
1porta
por3t2a.
2por3tag
portun3a
por1tu
4portun1it
por1p
po1vet
po1ka
pok1ey
pok1i
pour1i
1poun
pout1e
pou1li
poult3e2
1po2o.
poo1d
poor1i
pook1i
poo1na
poo1i
1pone
3pondency
ponde4
pond3enc
po2nd
p1o2n1r2
1pon1n
pon1ie
pon1in2
pon3i2cs
pon3ify1
pon1iz
pon1te
pon3ges
pon3ger
po1n2y.
pob1
po1ca1t
po1cho
po1chl
po1ce
po1cen1
po3crit
pocr2
3points
poi1t
poil1i
2p1of
p2ot
pot3ash
pot1ab
pot1ag
po1tha
3pothes
pothe2
poth3e2r.
poth3ers
po1thy
po1tee
3pot1enu
po1tra
po1tom
1pot1ic
pot1t
1po2l.
polar1
po1lan
pola4to
p2ole
pol1er
po1leo
po1len
po1lei
po1lem
pol1de
polu1
po1los
polo1n
pological4
po1l4ogic
pologic1a
2p1ol2i.
pol1ie
po3lis1ti
pol3ing
3pol2ita
pol1t
pol1la
poll3ing
po1ge
poge2n1
p3og3raphe
p3o4g1raphy
po1gro
po1go
po1g2l
pom1ad
pom1an
1pom1e
pomet1
po1mo
pom1on
poys1
pow1el
pown1
1pop.
po1pa
1pope
1pops
po1pr
pop1t
po1ple
po2q
pox1ic2
p1na
p1nes
p1no1s
pno1th
p3not3ic
p1b
pbroth3
pbr2
p1brot
pboard3e
p1boa
p1box1
p1c
pcoun1
pcom1
1piah
pi1ad
pi1ast
pi1ar
pi1ab
pi1af
pi3at
pi4ato
3pia1tory
p1ial
pia1g
pi1e2r.
pie1ro1
pi1en
1piens
1piec
p2i2e2t
pie1g
pi1da
pi3ders
pi3dery
pi1dem
pid1d
pi1do
pi1dis
pid1g2
p2i2s.
pis1es
pis1er
pis2si
pis1k
pi1so
pi1sid
pi1sis
pis3tr
pi2s1to
pis1tl
pir3ate
pir3als
pi1rea
pir1er2
pir2s
pi1ros
pi1rog
pir1ie
pir1in
pik1i
pi1u2ms
1pion
pi1oc
pi1oi2
p4i2n.
pin1al
pin1et
pin3ell
pin1du
pi2nd
pin1u
pi1not
pinna3cl
p2inn
pin1na
pin1nac2
pin1i
pini3er
pin1te
ping2s
pin1yi
1pin1q
pi1b
pic4as
pi1can3t
p4i2cs
picker3i
pick1er
pic3ule
1pico
pi1c2o.
pi1ci
pici1e
1pi2ct
pi1fi
pif1fi
pif1fy1
pi1fy1
pi1tan
p4i1tat
p3itall
pi1tha
pith1i
pit1eo
pi3tons
pitz1
1pi2l.
1pila
pi1las
pi1lar
pi1lau
pila3tes
pilate2
pi1lep
1pils
pil3ose
pil1ou
3pilots
pi1log
pil2n
1pili
3pillar1ie
pil1lar
pil1lari
pill3er
pil3loc
pill3in
pi3geons
pig1o
pi1me
pi1men1
pi1mi
pimp1i
pim1pl
1pi2pe
pip1i
pi1qui
pfam1
p1fr
pt1an
pt1ab
p1tac
p1tai
p4tains
p2t1ath
p1tati
pt1am1
p1tea
p1teas4
p1tee
pt1es
pter2a
p1teri
p1ten
p1tet
p1tem
ptem2p
p1tr
ptrol1
p1tu
ptus1
ptun1i
ptup1
p1toe
p1tori
p1to1k
p1toc
ptol1
pt1olo
pto4grap
p3tog3raphe
p3to4g1raphy
ptoma4
pto2me
p1top
pto1ph
pt1c
p3t2i.
p1tie
p1tid
ptis3ta
ptis3tr
ptiv1a
p1tivi
p2tin
p3ti2n.
p3tine
ptic3a
p2ti1ce
p1ti2cs
p1ti1ci
p1til
pti1m
p3ti2m2a.
p1ty
p2ty1i
p1lad
pla1si
plas3te2r.
plas3ters
plar1i
4plau4sibi
plaus1i
plaus1ib
1plane
p1la2nd
pland3e
1plani
plan3t2e.
plant3er
plant3i
1plac
4placabi
plack1
pla3ci
pla1ta
pledg3es
1plev1
pleo1
ple2n1d
ple2c1t
pleth1
plet3ed
ple1to
ple2t3in
2plel
1pleg
1plem
plement3ary
ple1me
ple1men
ple1ment
plement3al
p1ley
1plex
plex1u
plu1v
plun3ger
plumb3er
plu2mb
plumb3i
p1lu1p
p2l2o.
1plor
1plon
p2loc
ploi2
ploit3er
3ployabi
ploy1ab
1ployi
plow3er
1pli1a
1pli3er
1plis
p1lik
p1li2n.
plin1a
plin1i
pli3cer
pl2i3cin
3plici1to
3pliciti
pli1fi
pli1fi2e
pli1fy1
pliment3ary
pli1men
pli1ment
1pliq
ply1
p1g
pgrad4
p1m
pment3a
p1ment
p1ya
py1d
pyr3e2n
pyr1u
pyr3it1i
pyn1
py1b
py1c
py1i
py1tho
pyth3i
py1la
pyl1e2
pywrit3i
py1w
pyx1
p1w
pwalk2i
pwell1
p1ja
p1jo
p1z
p1pa
ppar1e
pp1at
p2pa2l.
ppa1la1
p2pals
p1ph2
p3pear4i
ppe2a
p1pee
p2ped
p1per
p3pe2r.
pper3es
pper1o
p2per1c
pper3ie
p2p2er1f
p2perti
p2p2er1m
p1pen
p2pens
p3pen4s.
ppen1i
p1pet
pp1ett
p1pe2l.
p1pels
p1pel3la
ppel3li
p1pew
p2ps
pp1sa
p1pr
p3prais2e.
ppre1c
p3proa2
ppropriat4e
ppro1pr
ppropri1at
p1pu
ppur1
p1p2o.
p1pos
pposed2
p1poro
pport3er
p1poo
p1pon1
p1pocr2
p1pol
p1po1m
p1pi
ppi1no
ppi2c
p2pit
p1pla
p2plen
p3ple2t.
p3plets
p4plicab
2q.
qa1b
qa3tar1i
q1v
quar3i
qua1vi
4quacit
qua1to
qual3in
1quh
1quesa
1quess
1quers
1quenc
3quen4t.
3que1c
1que2t.
quel4
que1li
quel3l3i
quell4
1quo
quon3
qu1be
1quies
4quida2t2e
quid1at
3quite
quit3ed
qui3tou
qui1ti
1quy
qi1h
qiv1
qin1t
qta1
x1ae
xa1d
x1as1
x2a2s.
x1ar
xa1v
xavi1
xan1e
xan1de
xa2nd
x1an1n
xan1ti
x1ab
xa1ca
x1ace
x1acte
xa2ct
x1acts
xact1o
xacti2
x3actin2g.
x1at
x2a1tiv
xalt1e2
xalt1i
xa1ge
xa1gr
xa3go2n.
xa3gons
x3agg
xa1men
x3am1ete
xam1i
x3amp
xam3ples
xa1p
x1h
xhal1i
xhib1
x1edo
x1e2d1n
x1edl
x1est
xero4g
xer2i
x3ertin
1x2erx
xe1u
xen1i
xe1cr2
xe3cuta
xe3cut4e
xec3uto
xec3u1tiv
xe3cu1tio
xe3cutin
xe1t
xel1a
xe1g
xem1ic
xempt4
x3emp2t.
x3empte
x3empts
x3emp2tin
x1s
x3st
x1ua
xu3ali
xu3da1tio
x1uded
x1udes
x1ud1i
xus1
x3use
x1ur
xuri1
x1ub
xu1c
xul3tat
xult1e2
xult3in2g.
xul4tin2
xo1d
xo1sk
xo1sp
x1o2r.
x3orab3i
xor1ab
x1or1d
x1ors
x1orb
xorbi1
xori1o
xorious4
x1ou
x1o2n.
xon4o
xonom4
x3on3o3mie
x3ono1mis
xo3nom3ic
x3on1omy
xon1i
x1ony
xo1b
xo1c
xo1th
xother3
xothe2
xo1ter
x4ot1is
xot3i2c.
x1o2l
x1og
xog1a
xoma1
xo1p
x1nes
x1b
x1c
xcav1
x3ch
xchan3ges
xch2ange
xchan3ger
xchan3gi
xce1d
x2ce2l.
xcept3e
xcep2t3in
xcep1ti
xcret3ed
xcr2
x1crete
xcre2t3in
x1creti
xcrement3a
xcrem2
xcre1men2t
xcre1men
xci2t
xcit1a
xclam1
xi1an
xia1to
xi1at
x1i1er
xie1l
xi1dat
xid1ed
xi1diz
xis2
x1is1t1i
x1ism
x1ir
x1iv
x1ini
x1ing
x1ib
xic2
xi1cab
x2icali
xi1con
xi1col
x1icit
xi1cil
xi1f
xi2f2y.
xify1
xite2
xit1ed
xit1es
x1itie
xit1in
x2i1tim1
xil1a
x1iled
xil1in
xil3las
x1i1ly
xi1ge
xi1gu1i
xi1gl
x1i2m.
x1im2a.
xi3mat
xi4mate
x3imal
xim2e
xi1met
x1i2ms
x1imu
x1imo
x3imili
xi1miz
x1f
xt1ab
xta1p
x1te
x2t2e.
xter1
xtend3er
xtende4
xte2nd
x3tel
x1tr2a.
xtra1d4
xtradi3tio
xtradi2t
xtrad3iti
x3tra2s.
x1tran
x3trac
x4trace
x1trap
x1tre
x1tru
x3tri
x1trin
xt1ua
xtu3al1it
x1tur
x1tup
x1to
x2to2l.
x1ti
xle1t
x1li
x1ly
x1g
x1m
xy1a
xy1e
x1ys2m.
x1ys2ms
xy1r
xy1c
xy1i
xy1t
xyli1
xy1m
x1w
x1pa
xpa2n4d
xpan3d3er
x2pe2l.
xpel3ler
xpel3li
x1pro
x1pu
x1p2o.
x2po2s.
x1por
xport3
x1pou
x1po1n
x1p2ot
x2pia
x1pir
x1ple
x1plo
x1pli
x3pl2ic1ab3i
x1q
xquis1
’1sh
’shan1
’west4
